Missouri, session 2026, SB1368.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 640, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 640.800 and 640.801,
to read as follows:
640.800. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of natural
resources;
(2) "Weather modification", the injection, release, or
dispersion, by any means, of a chemical, a chemical
compound, a substance, or an apparatus into the atmosphere
in the state for the purpose of affecting the temperature,
weather, climate, or intensity of sunlight.
2. No person or entity shall engage in weather
modification in the state. Any person or entity who
violates provisions of this section shall be subject to the
following penalties:
(1) A class E felony; and
(2) A civil penalty not to exceed two hundred thousand
dollars.

SB 1368 2
3. Any individual may report violations of this
section to the department. If the department finds that a
violation occurred, the department shall ask the attorney
general to commence an action in the court of competent
jurisdiction. If the court finds that a violation occurred,
the court may grant damages, civil penalties, criminal
penalties, injunctive relief, attorney fees, and any such
other relief the court finds appropriate.
4. The department shall create an online publically
accessible form for the purpose of reporting any instance of
weather modification in the state. The department shall
also establish a screening method of reports under this
subsection and shall investigate each report for any
violations of this section.
5. All moneys collected from civil penalties under
this section shall be deposited into the natural resources
protection fund air pollution permit fee subaccount
established pursuant to section 640.220.
6. The department shall promulgate rules to enforce
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.

SB 1368 3
640.801. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Aircraft", a machine, a vehicle, or device
capable of atmospheric flight, except a parachute or other
device used primarily as safety equipment;
(2) "Airport", the same as defined in section 305.120;
(3) "Department", the Missouri department of natural
resources;
(4) "Weather modification", the same as defined in
section 640.800.
2. Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, all
operators of airports in the state shall submit monthly
reports to the department, using a method determined by the
department. Such reports shall contain the following:
(1) Any physical presence of an aircraft on the
premises of any airport if the aircraft is equipped with any
part, component, device, or otherwise, which may be used for
the purpose of weather modification; or
(2) The landing, takeoff, stopover, or refueling of
any aircraft equipped with parts, components, or devices
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection located on
the premises of any airport in the state.
3. The department shall review the reports under
subsection 2 of this section to determine whether any
violation occurred pursuant to the provisions of section
640.800. If the department determines that a violation or
violations occurred, the department shall ask the attorney
general to commence an action pursuant to the provisions of
section 640.800.
4. The department shall submit aggregate reports under
subsection 2 of this section to the Missouri department of
transportation every quarter of each calendar year. The

SB 1368 4
Missouri department of transportation shall not expend any
state funds to any airport project or program if the airport
has any aircraft located on the premises of the airport and
such aircraft is engaged in weather modification.
5. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule,
as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
under the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓